











































Ankit Bhatia Robert Giometti Aurélien Nicolas

White Paper v1.3
March 2018

DECENTRALIZED SOCIAL NEWS PLATFORM



2

CONTENTS

Glossary 5
ERC20 5
Sapien Platform 5
Sapien Network / Ecosystem 5
Branch 5
SPN 5
Staked SPN 5
Unstaked SPN 5

Overview 6
SPN Token Sale 6
SPN Utility 6

Introduction	 9

What is Sapien? 10
Core Values 10
Key Features 10
Live Beta  10

Objectives	 11
Establish a Proof of Value Consensus Protocol 11
Launch the first Democratized Autonomous Platform 11
Build a Robust Marketplace and Incentivize User Contributions 11
Power Future Applications on the Sapien Network 11

Why Contribute? 12

Product Roadmap 13

User Stories 15
Creators 15
Curators 15
Freelancers 16
Developers 16
Media Companies 16

Market Opportunity 17
Social Media 17
E-Commerce 17
Privacy 18
Media 19



3

Business Model 20
Marketplace 20

Buyers & Sellers 20
Sapien 20

Ad Platform 20
Users 21
Advertisers 21
Sapien 21

Extend to other Websites 21

Token Sale 22
Presale  22
Allocation of Presale Funds 22
Token Sale Phase #1 22
Minimum Goal 23
How to Contribute 23
Allocation of Funds (2018 - 2022) 24
Distribution of Tokens 25
Incentivizing the Network Effect 26

SPN Token 27
Proposed Utilities 27

Utility I: Staked SPN to Power the Sapien Platform 27
Utility II: Reputation Network built-in the SPN token 27
Utility III: Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Proposals 27
Utility IV: Content Payouts and User-to-user Tips 27
Utility V: Standardized Token for Integrated Marketplace 28
Utility VI: Ad Platform Revenue Sharing 28

Use Cases 29
Use Case I: Fake News 29
Use Case II: Unified Media Portal 30
Use Case III: Tokenizing Virtual Goods 31

Platform	Features	 33
How to Register 33
How to Qualify for Platform Payouts 33
Reputation 33

Backfeed Protocol 33
Voting Mechanisms 34
Rewards for Posting, Commenting, and Voting Rewards 35

Posting & Commenting Payouts 35
Voting Payouts 36
SPN Payout Management 36
How We Handle Voting Manipulation 36

Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Implementation 37
Proposal System 37
Branch Autonomy 37
Tribunals 37



4

Token Mechanics 38
Staking SPN 38

Staked SPN Capacity Bonus 38
Unstaking SPN 38
SPN Consensus Mechanism 39

Leadership 40
Core 40
Advisors 41

Competitive	Analysis	 43
I. Steemit 43

a) Choice of Blockchain 43
b) Distribution of Power 43
c) Barriers To Entry 43

II. Synereo 44
a) Technological 44
b) Token Utility 44
c) Philosophical 44

Risk Analysis 45
Quantum Computing Attacks 45

Public-Key Cryptography 45
Elliptic Curve Cryptography 45
Elliptic Curve Discrete Logarithm 45

Bots 45
Sybil Attacks 45
Inflation 46

Technical	Considerations	for	a	Dapp	 47
Data 47
Beta Release 47

SPN Integration 48
Search 48
Storage 48

Decentralized Release 48
Blockchain 48
Off-chain 48

IPFS & Swarm  50

References	 52



5

GLOSSARY

ERC20
A common list of rules for all Ethereum tokens to follow, allowing developers of all types to accurately predict how a 
token will function within the larger Ethereum ecosystem.

Sapien Platform
The Sapien Platform is a decentralized social news platform built with Meteor.js, the recommended framework for 
Ethereum Dapps (Decentralized Applications).

Sapien Network / Ecosystem
The Sapien Network is powered by the SPN token and includes the Sapien Platform, the decentralized marketplace, 
integrated third party applications, digital content creators, and media publications.

Branch
Branches are the communities within Sapien. A branch can be either private or public, and focuses on a specific topic 
or theme. Users have reputations associated with each branch that they participate in, affecting their influence within 
the branch.

SPN
SPN is a cryptocurrency used in Sapien to reward users for their contributions. SPN can be freely exchanged between 
users within Sapien or held in any ERC20-compliant wallet. SPN can be used for social actions (posting, comments, 
voting, etc.), purchasing physical or virtual goods on the Sapien marketplace, and to purchase premium content. SPN 
will be awarded to quality content creators within Sapien, and will track a user’s reputation as their contributions are 
evaluated.

Staked SPN
In order to be rewarded for contributions on Sapien, a user must have staked SPN. Unstaked SPN can be staked by 
locking it into a separate smart contract for a fixed duration of one year.  Upon completion of the staking contract 
the SPN will be returned to its unstaked form. Users can choose to stake SPN tokens again to increase their capacity 
for doing social actions, user-to-user tips, and participating in platform and community proposals. Staked SPN is used 
within the Sapien ecosystem and will not be listed on exchanges.

Unstaked SPN
Unstaked SPN is not in the Sapien ecosystem. For example, this can be SPN tokens in a personal wallet. A user can 
manage their portfolio of staked and unstaked tokens within their digital wallet.



6

OVERVIEW

 - Vision: Sapien is a democratized, tokenized, reputation-based social news platform capable of rewarding millions 
of digital content creators without any centralized intermediaries. Sapien will be powered by our utility token, 
SPN, and built to provide a smooth user experience that will bring the benefits of the Blockchain to the masses. 

 - Token sale: Users can acquire SPN tokens to use on the Sapien platform immediately.
 - Official	Website:	https://www.sapien.network
 - SPN Decimals: 18
 - Initial	Token	Supply:	500,000,000
 - Growth Rate: All new tokens will be minted through Sapien and distributed to value creators at a controlled 

inflation rate.

SPN Token Sale
 - Token	Allocation:

• 20% reserved for team and advisors (100M)

 » 6-month cliff with a 24-month vesting schedule

• 45% sold during Pre-sale and Token Sale Phase #1 (225M)

• Up to 5% distributed as Bounties (25M)

• 30% in Sapien reserve for future Token Sales and Airdrops (150M)

 - SPN	Distribution: Smart Contract will distribute tokens after Token Sale Phase #1 is complete.
 - Token	Sale	completion:	250,000,000 SPN tokens are distributed or April 3rd, 2018, whichever comes first.
 - Unsold SPN: SPNs not sold in the Token Sale will be transferred to the Sapien reserve.

SPN Utility
1. Tokens will exist in staked and unstaked forms. Staked tokens will provide users with platform functionality. 

Unstaked tokens will be listed on exchanges.

2. The token will keep track of a reputation within each community the user is part of, accumulating a score that 
reflects their expertise and reduces the spread of fake news.

3. Power a Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP), enabling users to participate in organizational decisions 
and shape product roadmap with a proposal system.

4. Allow holders to purchase physical and virtual goods, content, and services in a decentralized marketplace.

5. Reward digital content creators who generate quantifiable value, determined with the consensus of the 
community.

6. Share ad revenue with users who opt-in to see advertisements. By staking more tokens, users can earn a larger 
portion of the revenue they generate for Sapien.



7

This page was intentionally left blank



8



9

INTRODUCTION

A multitude of theories behind human intelligence suggest how fundamental social networks have been to the 
evolution of our species, Homo Sapiens.1 Whereas thousands of years ago the primary objective of interaction 
was survival, we now interact for numerous reasons, ranging from business to pleasure. Companies like Reddit and 
Facebook have enabled us to continue this ancient practice of socializing, while simultaneously driving open-source 
innovations like React.js and GraphQL. Another example of the earliest social activity is payments. Bitcoin is the 
first successful implementation of a borderless, cryptographical store of value enabling us to discreetly send funds 
to another person. Yet it was Satoshi Nakamoto’s brilliant idea behind the coin, the Blockchain, that has opened the 
floodgates of innovation. Immutable, hashed data is stored in blocks that are chained together to create a distributed 
database, secured with cryptography. This new technology has begun to disrupt everything from healthcare to 
banking to consumer apps. It is quite likely that we are witnessing the early stages of Web 3.0. Our team believes it 
is now feasible to combine the innate human desire for social networks with the immense power of the Blockchain 
to give each individual unprecedented control over their online social experience. We intend to build a democratized 
social platform that truly serves its users, fueled by a flexible cryptocurrency, SPN, built on the Ethereum Blockchain.

1 https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Evolution_of_human_intelligence#Social_brain_hypothesis



10

WHAT IS SAPIEN?

Sapien is a highly customizable, democratized social news platform capable of rewarding millions of content creators 
and curators without any centralized intermediaries. Sapien is powered by an ERC20 compliant cryptocurrency 
called SPN. The Sapien network will rapidly evolve to include a marketplace, various integrations, and third-party 
applications.

Core Values
1. Democracy - Users should have the final say over their communities and should be incentivized to contribute.
2. Privacy - Targeted advertising is profitable but inherently flawed because it exploits user data and infringes on 

user privacy.

3. Free Speech -  A fundamental principle that should be protected online with disruptive tools.
4. Customizability - Each user should be able to tailor a social experience to their liking.

Key Features

Live Beta 
You can join the beta waitlist with this link: https://www.sapien.network.

Public/Private Browsing
Seamlessly switch between public 
and private modes to experience 
Sapien with your real identity or 
anonymously.

Subscriptions
Subscribe to branches to stay up to 
date with the latest posts from your 
friends and people around the world.

Friends, Groups, and Posts
Add friends, create groups, share 
posts, write comments, and expand 
your horizons.

Feature-rich Chat
Join text and voice channels with 
our powerful chat interface, which 
provides a more dynamic and 
engaging user experience.

Encryption
Protect your online privacy. Sapien 
protects your personal data and 
offers encrypted chat conversations.

Highly Customizeable
Every individual is unique. Have 
control over every feature and tailor 
your own social experience.
...and much more



11

OBJECTIVES

Establish a Proof of Value Consensus Protocol
At its core, SPN derives its value from the ability to collaboratively distinguish high-quality content throughout the 
Sapien Network. The proof of value mechanism will promote quality contributions and reward users accordingly. 
As the contributions of users are evaluated throughout the network they will accumulate a score that reflects their 
reputation. This will allow a user’s domain-specific expertise to be reflected within their communities. Within Sapien, 
reputation will mitigate trolling and reduce the spread of fake news. The reputation system is inherent to the SPN 
token and thus not restricted to the Sapien platform.

Launch the first Democratized Autonomous Platform
To create a truly autonomous social platform, users must have real power over the direction of the platform. Thus, one 
of the capabilities of the SPN token will be to give users a voice through our innovative proposal system. This will allow 
users to participate in organizational decisions, feature developments, and marketplace rewards. SPN stakeholders 
will be in a unique position to suggest and prioritize milestones on our project roadmap. With the first autonomous 
social platform, we can cultivate a passionate and engaged community that has the ability to change its values 
over time. In addition, SPN will enable users to vote on proposals within a branch, facilitating democratic decisions 
at a community level. Ultimately, this will enable branches to self-moderate, without the need for authoritative 
moderators that are the norm on similar platforms.

Build a Robust Marketplace and Incentivize User Contributions
Content creators should be rewarded fairly for their time and the original content they add to a platform. Users 
will be able to tip one another for posts or comments and even receive payouts in SPN from Sapien for posts 
that have created quantifiable value. By enabling users to pay each other in this manner we believe we will foster 
an environment that supports quality content and liberates content creators from dependence on ad revenue. A 
decentralized marketplace is planned in the roadmap to enable SPN holders to purchase exclusive premium content, 
services, physical merchandise and virtual goods, including themes, integrations, and features.

Power Future Applications on the Sapien Network
As Blockchain applications become the new standard, Sapien will build out a development platform powered by SPN 
to offer users a wide variety of app integrations and permit external apps to leverage our user base. We intend SPN 
to function as a unified currency for all in app purchases on integrated apps. New applications will be able to integrate 
with SPN easily through the Sapien API allowing users to exchange and make purchases with SPN. The unified 
market created by SPN will tether virtual items purchased inside integrated applications to the real world value of 
SPN creating a new dimension of interactions between users on applications integrated with SPN. Lastly, our goal is 
to establish a global reputation network on all SPN integrated platforms to fight fake news everywhere.



12

WHY CONTRIBUTE?

Once implemented, we believe that SPN will be one of the most versatile tokens in the online space. Not only will 
the SPN token be immensely useful within the Sapien ecosystem, SPN will also facilitate creating and transferring 
value within and beyond the platform. Fake news will be greatly mitigated with secure identities on the Blockchain 
and an extensive reputation system. SPN will be the backbone of every social action and transaction that happens, 
embedding its growth potential in the expansion and adoption of the platform instead of any arbitrary fluctuations 
in the crypto market. Content creators will truly have a viable means of earning rewards without being exploited by 
centralized entities. Users will finally have a real voice in collaborating and shaping the community they want to be 
part of. By leveraging the latest Blockchain technologies, we can work together to build a platform that is immune 
to censorship, guards our free speech, respects our privacy, and persists content throughout humanity’s existence. 
Now is the time.

Be	on	the	right	side	of	history.



13

PRODUCT ROADMAP

15

16

17

18

19

20

2015 - Idea behind Sapien is conceived and development 
begins

2017 Q1 - Private beta launched with integrated chat and 
voice channels

2017 Q2 - Transition from an end-to-end encrypted 
platform to Blockchain application

2017 Q3 - Completed SPN white paper and begun 
Ethereum smart contract development

2017 Q4 - Launch testnet faucet and showcase token in 
Sapien

2019	 Q1	 - Build infrastructure for Democratized 
Autonomous Platform

2019	 Q2 - Roll out marketplace, premium content and 
features

2019	 Q3 - Open developer platform to third-party 
applications and integrations

2019	Q4 - Optimize platform to scale and add 1M new 
users per month

2016 - Closed alpha is launched, written with full-stack 
javascript

2018 Q1 - Token Sale Phase #1 and implement payouts 
for creators and curators

2018 Q2 - Increase brand awareness and begin porting 
Sapien platform to a DApp

2018 Q3 - Incentivize network effects and revamp UI/UX 
for crypto novices

2018 Q4 - Ramp up marketing efforts; acquire 10k new 
users per month

2020 Q2 - Tokenize user data and extend token use to 
other websites   

2020 Q4 - Add 10 million new users per month



14



15

USER STORIES

There are several users that would comprise Sapien’s vibrant ecosystem:

1. Creators: Users who submit original digital content (posts, comments, videos, memes, podcasts, etc.) to the 
Sapien platform. Their quality contributions are compensated with SPN tokens that increase their reputation on 
the platform.

2. Curators: These are trusted guides for different branches on Sapien. Curators discover and share high-quality 
content within their branch and network. For these users, we have designed voting rewards in SPN tokens that 
recognize their efforts.

3. Freelancers: Individuals who would like to provide services to Sapien users in exchange for SPN tokens. Tasks 
will be completed on the marketplace with zero transaction fees.

4. Developers: Decentralized app developers who want to contribute to the platform or ecosystem. As the 
platform grows, our team will open up a developer platform that will allow engineers to build third-party 
applications, integrations, and features for Sapien.

5. Media Companies: Media Publications can partner with Sapien to set up independent publishing, individual 
prices for content, create a sustainable business model, and build reputation with our users.

Creators
Name: Alice

Background: Alice is a prolific content creator who just graduated from college. She loves writing articles on technology 
and current events. She also recently launched a podcast on SoundCloud to document her growth as an author and 
a human.

Problem: As much as she enjoys creating digital content on the Internet, Alice is disappointed that she has made $0 
from her articles, posts, and podcast. She would love to create content for a community of like-minded people that 
can reward her for her consistent and passionate work. She also wants to set up an easy way for power-users to 
subscribe to her premium content.

Solution: Alice finds out about Sapien. She posts her articles, podcast, and videos in the technology branch, receiving 
great feedback from the community. Her efforts are rewarded with SPN tokens, some of which she uses to launch 
her own branch on Sapien for premium content. She eventually gets hundreds of thousands of followers that are 
subscribed and paying her weekly in SPN tokens for her content. Alice is excited that she can finally pursue her 
dreams!

Curators
Name: Waylan

Background: Waylan is often found in the “new” section of Reddit and 9gag. He spends some of his time curating 
content on these platforms, giving an upvote if he believes a post should go to the front page or a downvote if he 
thinks the content is irrelevant or a repost. 

Problem: Users like Waylan are absolutely essential to platforms that depend on users to evaluate the content 
generated by other creators in an online community. Unfortunately, Waylan is not currently rewarded for his time 
and effort despite thousands of curators like him underpinning user-generated platforms.

Solution: Waylan joins Sapien. As a curator on the platform, Waylan uses his staked SPN to gives quality contributions 



16

upvotes. Depending on how early he votes, Waylan now can earn rewards in the form of SPN tokens if the community 
also finds the post valuable. At the end of the rewards window, Waylan will receive all of his originally staked SPN 
back and any newly staked SPN, proportional to the amount he originally staked and how early he voted.

Freelancers
Name: Rahul

Background: Rahul, a passionate full-stack JavaScript developer based in India, enjoys building web applications for 
clients all over the world. He enjoys the flexibility of working on his own schedule and setting his own prices.

Problem: To list his services, Rahul uses Fiverr and Upwork, two popular freelancing websites. However, as a result 
of being centralized, both companies take as much as 20% commision on every job that Rahul performs. Rahul is 
frustrated by these excessive fees, and rightfully so.

Solution: Rahul learns about Sapien’s decentralized marketplace, where in addition to listings for physical goods and 
virtual commerce, he can also list his services with zero transaction fees. Payments are handled efficiently by the SPN 
token. He is also happy to notice that as he completes projects successfully, his reputation increases as a vendor. 
Sapien’s global reputation system lets other websites integrate the SPN token and view Rahul’s stellar reputation.

Developers
Name: Nzingha

Background: Nzingha has been active in the cryptocurrency space since the early days of Ethereum. She’s an 
experienced developer and a strong believer in Blockchain technologies. She routinely contributes to open source 
projects and is active on social media.

Problem: Nzingha enjoys using current platforms, however, she understands the promise of Web 3.0 to return the 
power to the people. She has many experimental ideas that she wants to try out but unfortunately, can’t contribute 
directly to any existing centralized websites and open source projects do not reward her time.

Solution: Nzingha learns about the developer platform for the decentralized social news platform, Sapien. The 
platform enables her to build on top of the platform and sell her creations in an open marketplace. All transactions 
on the marketplace are powered by SPN tokens. Nzingha can now contribute to the Sapien platform with themes, 
integrations, and features, while also opening up a sustainable revenue source for her.

Media Companies
Name: Carlos

Background: Carlos is the chief Editor of a media publication called Now!. Now! is a publication focused on delivering 
high-quality, impact driven articles and papers about society. Carlos is an ambitious leader, who wants to rapidly grow 
the Now! digital user base.

Problem: Now! is finding it difficult to distinguish itself from the plethora of other publications in the market. Carlos 
realizes how hard it is to compete with prolific giants like NY Times and Buzzfeed. He knows that he must build the 
Now! brand and modernize his business to reach more users.

Solution: Carlos finds an untapped audience for his publication on the Sapien platform, where users can pay with SPN 
to subscribe to Now! Content. His team can set individual prices or subscriptions for articles, powered by the SPN 
cryptocurrency. Using the Unified Media Portal, Sapien users can organize their content in one place from Now! and 
other publications. Carlos is very excited to be at the frontier of media on the Blockchain and build a trusted brand 
on Sapien.



17

0.0

0.5

1.0

1.5

2.0

2.5

3.0

3.5

2017 2018* 2019* 2010* 2021*

2.46
2.62

2.77
2.9

3.02

N
um

be
r o

f u
se

rs
 in

 b
ill

io
ns

2017 2018* 2019* 2010* 2021*

1.66
1.79

1.92
2.05

2.14

N
um

be
r o

f u
se

rs
 in

 b
ill

io
ns

0.0

0.5

1.0

1.5

2.0

2.5

Number	of	social	media	users	worldwide	
From	2017	to	2021	(source:	Statista)

Number	of	Digital	Buyers	worldwide
From	2017	to	2021	(source:	Statista)

Figure 1.1 Figure 1.2

MARKET OPPORTUNITY

Social Media
There are currently over 2.3 billion social media users and by 2020 there will be more than 3 billion. Humans are an 
inherently	social	species;	thus,	some	form	of	social	media	will	continue	to	play	an	important	role	moving	forward.

E-Commerce
According	to	Statista,	the	number	of	people	buying	goods	or	services	online	will	increase	from	1.46	billion	in	2015	
to	more	than	2	billion	in	2020.	Technologies	like	Blockchain,	IoT,	and	cloud	computing	are	radically	changing	how	
consumers	will	transact	in	the	future.



18

Privacy
As	shown	by	Figure	2.1	and	2.2,	trends	indicate	a	rising	privacy	concern	and	a	rising	distrust	of	disclosing	personal	
info	on	social	media.	These	attitudes	show	internet	users	are	increasingly	concerned	with	privacy,	yet	simply	have	
no	option	but	to	continue	using	services	that	hoard	and	profit	of	their	data.

1.00

1.50

2.00

2.50

3.00

3.50

4.00

 22.
Unauthorized 
secondary 
used

 24.
Information 
privacy 
concerns

Ite
rati

on
 1

Ite
rati

on
 2

Ite
rati

on
 3

Ite
rati

on
 4

Number Hypothesis Findings

H1 Social Media Privacy 

concern are positively 

correlated to time.

Supported

H2 Distrust of Social 

Networking Sites is 

positively correlated to 

time.

Supported

H3 Risk perception for 

privacy disclosure is 

positively correlated to 

time.

Supported

H4 Privacy disclosure to 

Social Networking Sites 

is negatively correlated 

to time.

Supported

Social Disclosure Behaviors
(source:	Semantic	Scholar)

Longitudinal Study Hypothesis Results
(source:	Semantic	Scholar)

Figure 2.1 Figure 2.2



19

Figure 3.1

Figure 3.2

Media
Figures 3.1 and 3.2 below clearly indicate a move towards more digital spending and this clearly impacts media 
publishers.	 Sapien	offers	 these	creators	an	opportunity	 to	have	a	digital	 transformation	of	 their	businesses	by	
offering	consumers	additional	revenue	streams	to	monetize	and	reduce	losses.



20

BUSINESS MODEL

The primary focus after the SPN token sale will be to securely and accurately implement the proposed utility of 
SPN. At the same time, the success of the Sapien platform is essential to the  longevity of the SPN token. Thus, it is 
necessary to create a sustainable business model that aligns the values of SPN token holders, platform users, and 
company shareholders.

Marketplace

Buyers & Sellers
Users will be able to purchase and sell physical and virtual goods, services and premium content on the Sapien 
marketplace using SPN tokens. Reputation scores will be integrated into the marketplace, enabling users to be 
confident that the vendor they are purchasing from is reliable.

Sapien
Sapien will charge a 1% transaction fee to buyers and sellers on the Sapien marketplace unless they have a certain 
threshold of staked SPN. The minimum threshold will initially be set at the equivalent of $20 worth of staked SPN. If 
a buyer or seller have staked at least $20, then they will pay no transaction fees from their behalf. If either party has 
less than the minimum threshold staked, they will be charged a 1% transaction fee.

Ad Platform



21

The rising concern for privacy has been disregarded by most mainstream social platforms. As a result, a collective 
feeling of helplessness has emerged among users regarding the exploitation of their personal data to use popular 
services. Users should be in absolute control of their data and how other companies use it. Therefore, prior to any 
third-party integrations with Sapien, we will attempt to standardize and liquidize any data that we have amassed from 
our users. SPN tokens will be assigned to various elements of user data for activity, interests, subscriptions, likes, 
dislikes, etc. Users will have complete autonomy in determining what data is released and be able to reap the rewards 
for the consensual disclosure of information when third-party apps ask for permissions.

Users
User privacy is a critical part of our philosophy, and as such we will allow users to have complete control over their 
relationship with advertisements on Sapien. By default, users will see no advertisements and no personal user data 
will be collected without a user’s knowledge. If a user so desires, they can opt-in for Sapien to collect and assign SPN 
token value to their data. Then, users can choose to share their information with advertisers in exchange for SPN 
tokens. The more staked SPN a user has, the more SPN tokens they will receive for enabling advertisements. 

Advertisers
Ads will be purchasable on Sapien with SPN tokens and will be served to users who have enabled them. Advertisers 
will receive a substantial discount for purchasing ads with SPN tokens. Advertisers will be able to place ads on public 
branches that align with their target audience. The advertising experience will be similar to existing social platforms, 
except a majority of ad revenue will be given to users.

Sapien
The majority of revenue earned from ad purchases will be distributed to users who have enabled ads. Users will 
receive at least 50 percent of the revenue from ad purchases. The ratio of revenue distributed is dynamic and will be 
adjusted to keep the platform afloat. All ad transactions will be publicly viewable on etherscan.io. This way, Sapien 
can assure transparency and our users will retain full control over their experience on the platform.

Extend to other Websites
At its core, the SPN token will always have intrinsic value governed by market supply and demand. To promote the 
widespread adoption of SPN, we can integrate the token as purely a tipping or payment mechanism in Reddit, Slack, 
Twitch, etc., thereby increasing token liquidity. An open-source tipping system could be built by developers in each 
community to tailor SPN to each service and expose more people to the Ethereum Blockchain.



22

TOKEN SALE

Presale 
 - Token Exchange Base Rate: Phase #1 rate +20% (final exchange rate will be fixed closer to presale)
 - Currencies Accepted: ETH
 - Tiered Investment Structure:

• >$250k: +25% 

• >$100k: +15%

• >$50k: +7%

• >$10k: +3%

• <$10k: no bonuses

 - SPN	Distribution: Smart Contract will distribute tokens after Token Sale Phase #1 is complete.
 - Minimum Presale Goal: No minimum

Allocation of Presale Funds
Presale	funds	will	be	used	to	cover	legal	costs,	fund	the	marketing	campaign,	and	pay	for	the	development	of	SPN.

Token Sale Phase #1
 - Total	Hard	Cap	(in	USD): 30,000 ETH
 - Currencies Accepted:

• ETH: Natively supported.

 - Token Exchange Base Rate: 1 ETH = 6000 SPN
 - Bonus Structure:

• March 20 - March 21: +15%

• March 22 - March 23: +12%

• March 24 - March 25: +9%

• March 26 - March 27: +6%

• March 28 - March 29: +3%

• March 30 - April 3: no bonuses

 - Issuance Rate: All new tokens will be distributed to value creators within Sapien
 - Minimum Goal: 50,000,000 SPN

Minimum Goal
Our minimum goal has been set strategically to ensure that the Sapien core team can quickly, securely, and completely 



23

deliver on our promises for the SPN token and the Sapien platform. If our goal is not met, all contributors will be 
refunded through our smart contract, minus any funds that were liquidated for marketing and other expenses. 

How to Contribute
 - Contribution address will be released closer to the presale.

 - Send ETH from your personal Ethereum Wallet using MyEtherWallet, Metamask, Parity, Mist or Ledger Nano S

 - Your CONTRIBUTION address MUST be an ERC20-compliant wallet.
 - Do not send funds before the crowdsale begins, or your transaction will be rejected
 - Smart Contract will distribute tokens immediately after ETH is received in the crowdsale.

 - Guide: https://youtu.be/h-7EyHjDUuI



24

Allocation of Funds (2018 - 2022)

 - Administrative: To ensure day-to-day operations run smoothly as the project grows. 
 - R&D: Development for SPN, including core team and community developers. Funds will be liquidated as our 

company milestones are met.

 - Marketing: We will encourage organic community growth and launch an incentivized referral program. Thus, we 
have a smaller marketing budget than other similarly situated companies. Traditional media channels and Sapien 
will be used to reach our user base.

 - Legal: Compliance with the SEC and other regulatory entities will be a top priority for our token. Our budget is 
allocated to cover existing and any new regulatory laws applicable to SPN.

 - Security Audits: A separate budget has been allocated for continually auditing any new smart contracts our team 
develops, both for the SPN token and the Sapien platform.



25

Distribution of Tokens

 - 45% of SPN created during our token sale will be reserved for contributors who send ETH to the smart contract 
address.

 - 20% of SPN will be locked in a smart contract for the founders and team, subject to a 6-month cliff and 24 month 
vesting period.

 - 30% will go to the Sapien reserve which will be distributed in our Token Sale Phase #2 to augment platform 
growth, distributed via Sapien, or burned to control inflation.

 - Up to 5% will be reserved for our bounty program, contingent on the total number of participants in the campaign. 
Participation details will be released in a separate document.



26

Incentivizing the Network Effect
Metcalfe's law2 states that the value of a network is proportional to the square of the number of connected users of 
the system, n2. The value of a social network clearly increases as more interactive users join. This law also reveals the 
difficulty facing a nascent social network, as its utility is lower when there are fewer users on the platform. In order 
to overcome this problem, we will include several incentives for new users. The earlier a user signs up, the more SPN 
they will receive. We will also create a referral program that will let a user send invitations to join the platform. Users 
will receive 10/m2  SPN for the m-th user that they have referred. Any SPN tokens distributed in this manner will be 
provided by tokens allocated in the Sapien reserve.

The n-th user to sign up will receive  SPN tokens from the Sapien reserve, where p is the percentage of 
the hard cap raised, staked automatically for a period of 12 months and without the option of immediately unstaking. 
If the hard cap is reached, the first 10,000 users will receive 1,985,446 SPN tokens; the 10,000th user who registers 
will receive 100 staked SPN tokens; the first 1,000,000 users will receive 19,985,401 tokens; and the 1,000,000th 
user who registers will receive 10 staked SPN tokens.

For context, with the current SPN phase #1 base rate and Ether price ($450 = 1 ETH), this corresponds to a user 
acquisition cost of $22.50 for the 10,000th user and $2.25 for the millionth user. If the market cap of SPN significantly 
changes, this equation will be adjusted to prevent currency dilution. This is shown below in the case that the hard-cap 
is reached.

2 https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Metcalfe's_law



27

SPN TOKEN

Proposed Utilities

Utility I: Staked SPN to Power the Sapien Platform
In order to encourage stability of the SPN token, the longevity of its platform, and the curation of good content, 
Sapien will allow tokens to be staked to access social features on the platform. SPN tokens can be staked for a period 
of 1 year. Staked tokens can be used to upvote content, vote on proposals, submit new proposals, tip, and access 
premium branches, and much more. On the other hand, unstaked tokens are liquid: unstaked SPN will be easily 
transferrable out of Sapien and tradable on exchanges.

Staked SPN tokens do not necessarily get consumed in platform transactions. Rather, consider them “locked up” for 
platform actions. For example, the platform will at first require 10 staked SPN to make a new post on the platform. 
Initially, exactly 10 SPN will be returned to the user at the end of the voting period for the post. When SPN payouts 
are integrated, it would then be possible for the user to receive back more than 10 staked SPN. However, if the user 
posts illegal content or violates community guidelines, it would be possible to penalize the malicious user by freezing 
their staked SPN.

Utility II: Reputation Network built-in the SPN token
Contributions made by users, publishers, and businesses on the Sapien platform will be inherently stored in the SPN 
token with a reputation score. All users will start out with a reputation score of one. Then, depending on the value 
the user adds to the platform, this score can be positively or negatively impacted. When quality contributions are 
evaluated positively, a user’s reputation within a community will increase; low-quality posts and comments will lower 
a user’s reputation. Reputed users will be delegated more “power” on the platform, allowing them to have a greater 
say in what qualifies as valuable contributions within their respective communities.

Utility III: Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Proposals
SPN token holders will be able to create and vote on proposals for Sapien. Proposals can theoretically consist of 
anything, ranging from organizational decisions to feature requests to marketplace reward modifications. Proposals 
will be at the core of the DAP, enabling users to self-organize and self-moderate their communities. This elevates 
the autonomy of a community, empowering users to actively build the community that they want to be a part of. 
Bad actors will be flagged for inappropriate behavior within a branch, creating a tribunal. A tribunal will enable the 
community to collaborate and decide if a user should penalized and to what extent. Reputation will be tightly tied to 
community organization and execution of the DAP.

Utility IV: Content Payouts and User-to-user Tips
To further encourage and cultivate quality content on Sapien, the SPN token will be the backbone of payouts and 
user-to-user tipping. Payouts for content creation are the primary mechanism for rewarding users and promoting 
the creation of quality content. User-to-user transactions will create an altruistic environment in which a user can 
selectively reward authors and original content creators for posts, comments, podcasts, videos, memes, etc. The 
elimination of transaction costs and the utility of a token (a tangible reward unlike Reddit gold) should sufficiently 
incentivize users to post original content, growing both the Sapien platform and the SPN token value.



28

Users will not be required to have substantial knowledge of cryptography or how tokens operate. Sapien will offer 
various settings that can be customized to fit the skill-level of users. The interface for single-time payments will be 
displayed in dollars, while the SPN token will be used in the background. Advanced users will have the option to 
manage their own private key for their SPN address. Users will also be able to set up recurring payments for premium 
subscriptions. Our intention is to open the benefits of SPN to everyone, regardless of their qualifications or crypto 
expertise.

Utility V: Standardized Token for Integrated Marketplace
The aforementioned DAP proposal system will be used to propel much of the development of the marketplace. 
After opening up the platform to developers, the interface will benefit from the collective imaginative power of our 
community.

The Sapien marketplace will be the ultimate portal to manage SPN and accelerate market liquidity. Within Sapien, 
users will be able to transfer tokens, view the marketplace, and manage their portfolio.

Transfer	Tokens: A simple interface to transfer and exchange SPN tokens.

Manage	Portfolio: Allows users to view their staked and unstaked SPN token distribution.

Marketplace: To complete the ecosystem, a community-driven marketplace will serve as the primary interface for 
users to create and access exclusive rewards, themes, and components, both within Sapien and through third-party 
businesses.

Our	team	priorities	for	the	marketplace:

1. Design and develop the initial rewards with input from our user base.

2. Actively reach out to businesses to negotiate discounts for SPN holders on products ranging from ride-sharing, 
to merchandise, to pizza, etc.

3. Launch a secure community platform for contributors to develop new features, themes, and integrations for 
Sapien users.

Utility VI: Ad Platform Revenue Sharing
User privacy is a critical part of our philosophy, and as such we will allow users to have complete control over their 
relationship with advertisements on Sapien. By default, users will see no advertisements and no personal user data 
will be collected without a user’s knowledge.

If a user decides to see ads, all revenue generated will be shared between the user and Sapien, with the user receiving 
no less than 50% of this revenue in the form of SPN tokens. Users will be able to increase the percentage of ad 
revenue they receive by staking SPN on Sapien. 

By default, user data will not be collected on Sapien. Users will be able to choose what data, if any, they want to 
share with advertisers. Users will receive a greater percentage of ad revenue for sharing their data with advertisers. 
The percentage of ad revenue received by a user will be based on a tiered system, with users receiving a greater 
percentage if they have more SPN tokens staked.



29

Sapien will also facilitate user-to-user advertising. Community (groups or branches) owners will have the option to 
display advertisements on their groups and will receive a share of ad revenue for doing so. The choice of whether or 
not to display advertisements is entirely up to the community owner and they will have complete control over which 
ads are displayed on their group page. Sapien will receive a small share of ad revenue generated in groups while 
the majority of this revenue will be split between the community owner and the users. The distribution of revenue 
between owners and users will also follow the above tiered structure. The portion of ad revenue a owner receives 
will increase as they stake more SPN.

Advertisers will be able to purchase ads on Sapien with either fiat or SPN tokens and reach users who have shared 
relevant information or to public branches that align with their target audience. Advertisers will also receive a 
substantial discount for purchasing ads with SPN tokens. 

Use Cases

Use Case I: Fake News
Problem: According to study done by Stanford University, there were over 30,000,000 fake items shared in the 
2016 campaign.1  In this era of fake news and alternative facts, it is not surprising that news subscriptions have been 
on the rise. The Washington Post recorded a year-to-year growth of 145% while The New York Times has seen a 
tenfold increase in subscriptions. People have an evident need to access quality content without worrying about the 
authenticity of the publisher and journalists involved. This trend makes it necessary to shift revenue generation from 
the manipulative “eyeball” business model to a more sustainable one that uses simple subscriptions. Transparency is 
essential in this industry, as it can directly influence the masses and motivate certain behaviors.

1 https://web.stanford.edu/~gentzkow/research/fakenews.pdf



30

The problem of fake news is compounded when technologies such as artificial intelligence become smarter and begin 
to learn what makes humans tick. Already, machine learning has enabled us to replicate the voices of individuals 
and combine them with video to give a convincing illusion that the person really did say the fake statements. Online 
entities, funded by large corporations, will continue spending millions in the booming attention economy, resulting 
in a constant bidding war for consumer attention. Inevitably, we will need to be quite discerning in how we consume 
content on the web as truth becomes blurrier. This is precisely where we can leverage Blockchain technology to help 
us identify and distinguish valuable content while directly rewarding the creators.

Solution: Sapien will leverage the Blockchain for a three-pronged attack against fake news:

1.	 Identity	on	the	Blockchain: Sapien will enable storage of identities on the Blockchain for the purpose of 
identification. All marketplace sellers will be required to verify their identity prior to selling content. Media 
publishers and well-known users will also be able to verify their identity on the blockchain. With identities on 
the Blockchain, it will be harder for trolls to deceive users into believing that they are someone they are not.

2.	 Reputation	in	Communities: Reputation will be fundamental to combating fake news and trolls on the 
platform. Lower reputation users will have significantly less power on the platform. Reputation is specific to a 
given branch and so helps identify a user’s expertise across a wide range of subjects. Moreover, reputation will 
be a valuable asset in the marketplace to exchange goods and services. A reputed vendor or content creator has 
earned their SPN through consistent contributions, great customer service, or validation from other reputed 
individuals. This enables the creation of a reputation network that will consciously help our users distinguish 
the sources of their information, making them less vulnerable to fake news or incessant trolling. Since this 
utility is inherent to the SPN token, it is easily extensible to other applications and businesses outside the 
Sapien ecosystem.

3. Something-at-stake Design: By allowing users to stake SPN tokens, we are able to align the interests of 
the Sapien platform and users. Users have a vested interest in creating quality content on the platform, or 
risk losing their staked SPN. With this “something-at-stake” design, trolls are discouraged from malicious 
behavior. Valuable contributions will fuel the growth of the platform, increase the value of the SPN token, and 
compensate users for their merits in the form of SPN rewards.

4. Machine Learning: Machine learning is a powerful tool that can be used to combat the spread of 
misinformation. We will use cutting-edge machine learning models to perform stance detection in order to 
determine whether headline claims are supported by evidence, specifically other articles posted on the Sapien 
platform and on the Internet. Using these tools we will be able to produce a probability that a headline claim is 
false. This probability can be displayed to users to help inform their judgment and to encourage them to further 
scrutinize the sources of an article.

 Undoubtedly, there will be users who attempt to manipulate the system for personal gain. In addition to 
freezing all funds and banning any users attempting to “game” the system, users will be able to flag fake or 
stolen content. The Sapien team will have a minimum involvement in determining what material is protected 
by free speech. While illegal or stolen content will immediately result in a ban from Sapien, punishments for 
reposting or posting questionable material will ultimately rest in the hands of the Sapien community.

Use Case II: Unified Media Portal
Problem: As advertisements masquerading as insightful articles have become rampant, traditional, quality journalism 
has struggled to survive. Many news sites have turned to paywalls, where users must pay to access articles. With 
so many diverse feeds of information at their disposal, the modern internet user may find it hard to justify paying a 
subscription to access a single source of news. SPN provides a unified solution, allowing users to access a wide range 
of quality content.



31

Solution: Our unified media portal will consolidate a diverse feed of content in one place for our users. Users can 
subscribe to quality content from media publications. Thanks to the Blockchain, users can pay publications directly 
using our cryptocurrency with 0 transaction fees. Links on the platform will drive organic traffic back to the company's 
website.

1. Premium Content: The creator of a branch can set a reasonable price, either to access a single piece of content 
or monthly subscriptions. A Sapien user can subscribe to a creator’s premium branch with the expectation 
that they will receive consistent quality content. With SPN, we are enabling direct transactions between users 
and content creators who believe their effort to create quality original content comes at an additional cost. 
Moreover, it would also be very simple for a multitude of services to emerge that cater to different interests. 
For example, services similar to Netflix could easily exist on the Sapien platform with à la carte show selection.

 Premium content will only be available to users who have staked at least $20 worth of SPN in total over a 
period of 1 year. For users found guilty of leaking content, 100% of their SPN will be frozen, Sapien account will 
be banned, and IP address permanently blacklisted.

2. Subscription	Service: The Sapien platform will be in a position to address the subscription service problem 
within the crypto community. As of now, there is not a platform that allows creators to sell their content 
to the community with subscriptions. Monthly and yearly fees are a huge part of the community but to pay 
in cryptocurrency requires the creator to manually handle each and every transaction. Through the Sapien 
platform, creators can set up recurring payment plans for their members who can pay this fee using the SPN 
token. The subscription fee will be automatically charge to the consumer and be paid for via SPN in their 
Sapien wallet. This allows creators to solely focus on making premium content for their members.

3. Media	Publications: Traditional media publishers like NY times have long struggled in being able to monetize 
their content using micropayments, primarily as a result of transaction fees with traditional modes of payment. 
Mobile applications have attempted to aggregate content from multiple publishers–often to the detriment of 
the publisher’s digital revenue streams. 

 The Sapien platform will offer publishers the opportunity to introduce micropayments via cryptocurrency, 
enabling consumers to access premium content at a very granular level. This will enable publishers to get away 
from the blanket paywall model that has failed with consumers.  However, a micropayment model, especially 
one where the SPN wallet would be integrated into a browser (e.g. Chrome plugin), would make shopping for 
content seamless.

 Augmenting crypto-micropayments can be a mobile application, which could aggregate all of the consumer’s 
purchases within one app. But in order for the publisher to not cannibalize their existing advertising revenues, 
users would be redirected to the publisher site to complete the reading experience. This would provide 
users with an enhanced user experience, while preserving current revenue streams and potentially accretive 
revenues through micropayment sales. The mobile app would serve not only as a viewport into content, but 
double as a Sapien Media Wallet. Over time, additional features, interesting to publishers and consumers alike, 
such as fake news filter and community authoring could be introduced.

Use Case III: Tokenizing Virtual Goods
Problem: Although virtual goods clearly have real value, as shown by the huge annual sum spent on things such as 
in-app purchases and cosmetic enhancements in video games, the true value of these virtual items has remained 
nebulous. A marketplace where such virtual items can be exchanged for tokens more firmly cements the exchange 
value of these commodities. 



32

The rapid expansion of the digital economy has created a burgeoning supply of virtual goods. Most of these virtual 
goods are present in isolated markets, and are therefore unable to be exchanged with other such goods. Virtual 
goods now represent a multi-billion dollar industry annually, despite the severe limitations in this sector due to 
the seemingly unexchangeable nature of these goods. By creating a single market for virtual goods, we hope to 
dramatically increase the volume of transactions in this space, simultaneously providing value to both consumers and 
content creators. We believe that such a marketplace need not be restricted to common virtual goods such as those 
present in video games. In the modern world, information is truly the most valuable commodity and thus any quality 
content has a place on our marketplace, whether it be an article, video, or virtual item.

Solution: We will create a marketplace in which virtual goods can be exchanged along with physical goods, services, 
and premium content. In addition to creating a marketplace for users to purchase virtual goods, we hope to create 
a platform allowing users to create and sell their own virtual items such as cosmetic enhancements or entirely new 
features on the Sapien platform. We believe that the extensible and decentralized nature of Blockchain applications 
will not only allow the community to influence the direction of the platform by voicing their opinions but will also 
allow users to contribute to the development of the application by creating self-contained features. In order to allow 
content creators to place their content on the Sapien platform, we will create an API, establishing all of the necessary 
infrastructure to allow content creators to sell their content. Content creators will be able to establish all relevant 
parameters, such as the price that they are willing to sell their content for, or whether they are willing to accept other 
offers for their content.



33

PLATFORM FEATURES

How to Register
To combat manipulation, we require the following to open a new account:

 - Full name

 - Private username

 - Email

 - Password

 - Verified phone number

 - Google Recaptcha

After getting verified, each user will have an initial amount of SPN token deposited to their Sapien digital wallet. The 
quantity of SPN tokens will depend on how early the user registers.

How to Qualify for Platform Payouts

SOCIAL ACTION
MINIMUM STAKED SPN PER 

ACTION
MAXIMUM STAKED SPN PER 

ACTION

Voting 1 10
Posting 10 100

Commenting 5 50

These are the initial staked SPN token ranges required to receive rewards from the Sapien platform. As the platform 
grows, the requirements will be adjusted in the best interest of the platform and users.

Reputation
In order to provide a more accurate representation of the value of a contribution in the Sapien network, user votes 
will be weighted in proportion to the user’s perceived value within a community. This is captured by their reputation 
score in that community, which changes as a their contributions are voted on. Reputation is branch specific and as a 
user contributes on Sapien they will accumulate various reputation scores that reflect their expertise across a broad 
range of subjects. 

Backfeed Protocol
Sapien’s reputation system expands upon the Backfeed Protocol.3 As our partner, DaoStack will enable the 
infrastructure for collaborative creation and distribution of value. The protocol provides the framework to create a 
Proof of Value mechanism in the Sapien Network. This protocol enables reputation to flow within a decentralized 
network, reflecting the value that a user provides to a community. Reputation scores are linked to the users who have 
earned them and cannot be transferred between users. Reputation scores are affected by two distinct mechanisms. 
Reputation can be earned through contributions or the evaluation of another user’s contributions. Within Sapien, 

3 https://backfeed.cc/



34

a contribution can be a post, comment, DAP4 proposal, or marketplace transaction. Contributions are evaluated 
by community voting, which requires SPN to be staked. A user must stake a portion of their reputation in order to 
make an evaluation, which can be recouped when the contribution is evaluated positively by other users, but may be 
lost. Reputation facilitates the distribution of value throughout the constituent communities of Sapien according to 
their respective values. A user’s reputation is bounded between 100 and -100, so no user will have disproportionate 
influence within a community, enabling Sapien to maintain a democratic user ecosystem. Any user with less than 
equal to 0 reputation will have no weight in evaluating the contributions of other users.

Voting Mechanisms
Posts can be voted on by staking a variable amount of SPN, up to a fixed limit. In the case that 0 SPN is staked, a vote 
will count towards visibility but not toward the payout pool or reputation. SPN can only be staked for voting for the 
duration of the reward window, which is set at one week. After the completion of the reward window, all payouts 
generated by the post will be distributed to users. After the reward window has passed, posts and comments can 
still be voted on and votes will count toward visibility but no longer contribute to the payout pool or reputation. The 
amount of staked SPN that can be used for posting, commenting, and voting is limited by a user’s capacity, which is 
determined by their total amount of staked SPN. Only staked votes will influence reputation.

Posts can be affected positively (upvote) or negatively (downvote). In order to be more resilient to collusive voting, 
the reputation change and payout are proportional to the median rather than the mean of the reputation scores of 
users who have voted on a post, weighted by stake. In order to stake a larger amount of SPN when voting, a user 
must stake a larger amount of reputation as well. The evaluation procedure for a single contribution is shown below.

4 Democratized Autonomous Platform

Ex. 1:  I stake 1 SPN (by pressing the upvote button) on a new post, which is locked for the duration of the voting 
window. After the reward window has closed, if the post did well, I receive more than 1 SPN back and can use 
that 1 SPN to vote on something else. If I have maximum voting power, I can stake up to 10 SPN on the post by 
pressing another button. If I vote with max voting power (currently limited to a maximum of 10 SPN), my vote 
counts for more in terms of visibility and I will receive a proportionally greater reward if the post does well when 
the voting window closes. 



35

The reputation score will be embedded into the SPN token. Thus, reputation can be extended outside of the Sapien 
ecosystem to any application utilizing SPN. Reputation serves a critical role in establishing the proof of value protocol, 
promoting quality content and reducing the spread of fake news and trolling.

Rewards for Posting, Commenting, and Voting Rewards

We believe that users should be rewarded for creating quality content. In order to achieve this, we will award the 
majority of newly minted SPN to users who post, comment, and vote on the Sapien platform. In order to receive 
rewards for creating a post, comment, or vote, a user must first stake SPN on the platform. To create a post, comment, 
or vote without earning rewards, no staked SPN is required; in this case, all SPN generated will go towards the 
platform reserve.

All	newly	minted	SPN	will	be	distributed	to	users	making	contributions	on	the	Sapien	platform	and	validators	who	
verify	transactions	on	the	Blockchain.

Posting & Commenting Payouts
Post and comment payouts will occur at a fixed interval, with the creator of a post or comment receiving SPN tokens 
proportional to the median of the reputation of users who have voted weighted by SPN staked. Posts and comments 
can receive a minimum payout of zero. This is shown by the formula below:

Where is the reputation of user   is the SPN staked on the post or comment by user x, n is the number of 
users who have voted on the post, X is the set of users who have voted on the post, and ⍺ is an inflation factor that 
will be adjusted to ensure that the SPN dollar value of payouts are proportional only to n and the above median.



36

Voting Payouts
In order to incentivize the creation of quality content, SPN tokens will be distributed to both the creator of a post, and 
the users who upvote the post. Ninety percent of the SPN tokens generated by a post will be rewarded to the content 
creator and the remaining 10 percent will be distributed among the users who upvoted the post. In order to receive 
a reward for voting, a user must stake SPN tokens. Users will need to withdraw their rewards manually.

As it is more difficult to identify a quality post when it has fewer upvotes, the SPN rewarded from voting will be 
proportional to the time at which the post is voted on. This will encourage users to browse new content and help 
create a more dynamic feed for all users. The decay factor λ, is defined  as follows: 

SPN Payout Management
Advanced users: Rewards generated from voting, posting, commenting will be added to your digital wallet balance. 
Staking duration must be specified, with a minimum period of one year.

Novice: Automatically managed rewards with all earned SPN staked for one year.

For both advanced users and novice users, the original SPN invested in voting, posting, or commenting remains on 
the same staked schedule as before. Users will be able to toggle their user experience on the platform at any point.

How We Handle Voting Manipulation
To prevent manipulation by malicious users, only a certain fixed amount of SPN will be usable at any one time to stake 
on posts for voting. Posts will have a window during which they may be voted on and, after this window expires, all 
SPN tokens staked during voting will be released and restakeable.

The inclusion of negative-voting will make voting manipulation more difficult, since highly reputable users or a large 
collection of users can cancel out the votes of a colluding group. In addition, attempted vote manipulation will be 



37

transparent to the community, because posts that gain a large number of votes quickly will be the most visible on the 
platform.

Posts that have been flagged by a significant portion of the community will have their staked SPN temporarily frozen 
until the community decides whether collusion has taken place. If the user is found guilty of manipulation, the original 
staked SPN will be transferred to the platform reserve. Repeated attempts at manipulation will result in freezing all 
of a user’s SPN tokens.

Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Implementation

Proposal System
SPN token holders will be able to participate in DAP voting to help influence the company roadmap and organization. 
It is important to note that SPN tokens do not correspond to equity in the company. Our goal is to simply create the 
infrastructure to support a democratic platform that can eventually move towards full autonomy. Our threat model 
will employ the following three strategies to ensure equal opportunity for DAP voters:

Mandatory Staking: Only SPN tokens that are staked for at least six months will count towards DAP voting. When 
staked through the smart contract, tokens cannot be transferred. A token holder who wishes to sell SPN tokens must 
unstake them from smart contract in order to do so. A token holder will not be able to vote on DAP proposals until 
they stake their SPN.

Vesting: Voters will initially not be able to vote using their entire SPN token supply. They will be able to vote on their 
first proposal with 10% of the SPN tokens they have staked, and this percentage will increase every time they vote 
on a proposal. If they do not vote on 10 consecutive proposals, their percentage of stakeable SPN tokens for DAP 
voting will be penalized by 5%.

Variable Stake Limits: Proposal creators will be able to select what percentage of staked SPN voters will be able 
to vote with. The higher the percentage, the more powerful the proposal and higher it becomes on the core team’s 
priority list. Lower percentage limits will increase each vote’s significance. Thus, each proposal creator should carefully 
weigh execution speed and voter voice, depending on the nature of the proposal.

Branch Autonomy
The reputation system will ultimately enable democratic management of branches without a centralized authority. 
Users will be able to make proposals within a branch and evaluate the proposals of other users. The Backfeed 
protocol will ultimately enable branches to self-moderate and enact proposals democratically to determine the future 
direction of a branch.

Tribunals
Users will be able to flag other users for inappropriate behavior within a branch, creating a tribunal. During this 
process, a random subset of users of a branch will be selected as validators, and will need to vote to determine 
whether the flagged user has acted inappropriately. The selected users will be notified and the next time they open 
the Sapien platform, the will be asked to participate in the tribunal. Once consensus is reached, votes will be weighted 
by reputation to ensure that trolls are adequately punished for acting against the values of a community.

 



38

TOKEN MECHANICS

Staking SPN
To stake SPN tokens, users can transfer tokens to a special smart contract with the help of ERC223. This contract 
will manage the staked SPN so that users can interact with the Sapien platform (post, comment, etc). Users will have 
multiple options to unstake their SPN, described in the section titled “Unstaking SPN.” As a result, users can easily 
transfer their tokens back to their wallets with ERC223, creating more liquidity for the SPN token.

Staked SPN Capacity Bonus
If users have SPN tokens in their portfolio that have been staked for more than 6 months, these tokens will receive 
a 15% Sapien platform capacity bonus. This capacity bonus will give 1 SPN token, that has been staked for a period 
greater than 6 months, the platform power of 1.15 SPN tokens.

Unstaking SPN
Users can also choose to liquidate their staked SPN to unstaked SPN at any time with 0% fees after one year. This will 
prevent large fluctuations of SPN price in the crypto markets and offer users a simple way to cash out without fees or 
destabilizing the Sapien platform. As the Sapien platform and SPN token stability increases, the conversion fees can 
be reduced to convert staked SPN to unstaked SPN more quickly. Platform users are encouraged to stake their SPN 
tokens. The default staking period is one year.

Advanced users: For precise control over their SPN, advanced users can see a live dashboard of all their SPN and a 
mapping from their holdings to different staked schedules.

Novice: Users will get notification when their staked SPN can be unstaked. It is at the user’s discretion if they want 
to continue staking their tokens or withdraw their earnings.

Users can unstake their SPN token immediately for a small withdrawal fee that depends on the remaining time left on 
the staking schedule. Earlier withdrawals will be more heavily penalized than late withdrawals. Withdrawals will be 
penalized by 0.526% per day, adjusted continuously if executed before six months, and 0.1096% per day, adjusted 
continuously between 6 months and 12 months. Below are the fees incurred for early withdrawal:

Percentage	of	SPN	Converted	after	Time	Elapsed	on	Staking	Schedule

<1 month: 0%   7 months: 83.33%

2 months: 16%   8 months: 86.66%

3 months: 32%   9 months: 90%

4 months: 48%   10 months: 93.33%

5 months: 64%   11 months: 96.66%

6 months: 80%   12 months: 100%



39

SPN Consensus Mechanism
The Ethereum Foundation is planning to move to a proof-of-stake model in 2018 that would require validators 
to stake their Ether in order to verify transactions on the Blockchain. Therefore, it makes sense to form the SPN 
consensus mechanism using Proof of Stake. Our specific implementation will depend on a variety of factors, including 
the specifics of the complementary technologies that we plan to integrate. Plasma’s proposed off-chain merkelized 
commitments would require us to implement a tokenized PoS that relies on the robustness of the underlying root 
chain and incentivizes SPN holders to operate in the economic interest of all token holders. This implementation 
would require SPN to bind to Plasma smart contracts to enforce protocol. Instead of mining rewards, validators 
participating in PoS will be rewarded transaction fees that will be proportional to the SPN the user has staked. The 
Plasma white paper also expounds on exit strategies for block withholding attacks or Byzantine behavior that would 
enable users to migrate to another chain or even root Ethereum chain with their tokens. If an attacker attempts to 
submit an invalid block, any other participant within the block can submit a fraud proof on a parent Blockchain, rolling 
back the invalid block and penalizing the attacker’s staked SPN. Similar to Ethereum’s Casper protocol, users on the 
platform would be required to have a substantial amount of SPN staked to become validators on Sapien. The exact 
Sapien PoS algorithm will be at the full discretion of the core developers with the intent of maximizing efficiency, 
security, and decentralization.

 



40

LEADERSHIP

SPN is an ambitious vision. It will be developed by experienced engineers and guided by knowledgeable advisors who 
are eager to make a social cryptocurrency a reality.

Core

Ankit	Bhatia,	Co-founder	&	CEO

Studied electrical engineering and computer science at UC Berkeley. Designed, developed, and pioneered 
the Sapien platform during his junior year. Full stack JavaScript engineer who enjoys bringing great ideas to 
life. Crypto enthusiast and investor since 2013. YCombinator SUS’17 graduate.

LinkedIn:  https://www.linkedin.com/in/ankitxbhatia

Robert	Giometti,	Co-founder	&	CPO

Studied Mathematics and Electrical Engineering & Computer Science at UC Berkeley. Spearheaded and 
developed many of the features, algorithms, and innovations in Sapien. Theorist who understands how 
modern technologies will transform future societies. YCombinator SUS’17 graduate.

LinkedIn:  https://www.linkedin.com/in/robert-giometti-78bb889b

Matias	Dorta,	Marketing	Strategy

Studied political science and marketing at American University and Florida International University. 
Previously Director of Marketing @ Bardot, The Loft at Space, More or Less, and PromotionalPartySticks.
com. Founder of ICO Informer and Crypto swag.

AngelList: https://angel.co/matias-dorta  

Aurelien Nicolas, CTO

Product security expert, with experience in web, distributed systems, and crypto. White hat hacker. CTO of 
an AI-for-enterprise startup. Researching applications of cryptography and computation integrity.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/aureliennicolas/



41

Stefan	Ionescu,	Solidity	Dev

Currently working as a CTO for a startup focused on NLP. Building machine learning models for self-driving 
cars in games and now focusing on applying the blockchain in the insurance world. Enthusiast of studying 
neurobiology and applied psychology alongside multiple programming languages.

LinkedIn:  https://www.linkedin.com/in/stefan-codrin-ionescu-205521121

Advisors

Christopher	Lee,	Marketing	Manager

Currently working as Director of Marketing for a growing IT company. Specialist in digital lead generation. 
Passionate about marketing strategy and new marketing technologies and platforms. Crypto enthusiast and 
investor since 2015 and believes the surface of Blockchain technology has barely been scratched.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/1smartchris/

Andy	Boot,	Head	of	Operations,	Europe

Co-founded a Blockchain start-up in 2014, Cointemporary–the first Bitcoin gallery. Studied Communication 
Design and Fine Arts. Blockchain enthusiast with a UX/UI Design background, particularly interested in user 
experience for the Blockchain sphere.

LinkedIn: https://angel.co/abab

Oliver Dinsmore, Content Strategy

Digital marketer, writer, and content creator with over 15 years of experience spreading the e-love. Created 
6000 pieces of content and worked with over 20 global brands to provide creative solutions in marketing 
and advertising. Founder of the naturalhigh.club

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/oliver-dinsmore-37027811/

Dr. Michaela Ulieru, Blockchain Expert

Professor Mihaela Ulieru, PhD is an expert in distributed intelligent systems working with many governments 
and organizations towards a healthier, safer, more sustainable and innovation-driven world. She founded two 
research labs leading several global large-scale projects in collaboration with international businesses such 
as Rockwell Automation, Daimler-Chrysler, SAP, Fanuc, BHP Billiton, Thales, NORTEL as well as government, 
academia and nonprofit leaders. She was appointed to numerous boards among which the Science Councils 
of Singapore, Canada and European Commission and recently to the Global Agenda Council of the World 
Economic Forum where she championed Blockchain as one of the Top 10 technologies of 2016. She advises 
several startups at the nexus of Blockchain and Artificial Intelligence, among which: LifeLink.com, MyBit.io, 
and SocialCash.io.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/mihaelaulieru 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/stefan-codrin-ionescu-205521121


42

Adnan Javed, Legal & Blockchain Advisor

Adnan is a qualified Lawyer and Engineer. He has worked in the IT/Telecommunications space with 
international businesses such as Ericsson and Nokia for the past 10 years. Three years ago he discovered 
Bitcoin, which led him to explore Blockchain applications and use cases. He has worked on numerous 
Blockchain projects, including large scale bespoke Blockchain projects across internet of things, finance and 
payments sectors. He is an advisor to multiple Blockchain startups including ZenCash and ETHLend. He has 
a keen interest in how Blockchain technology will advance in shaping all industry sectors from an adoption, 
regulatory and policy perspective.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/adnan-javed

Gregory Berkin, Business Strategy

Gregory Berkin is the Managing Director of Concours Ventures, a Silicon Valley boutique angel group focused 
on next generation geospatial, virtual, augmented and mixed reality (VR/AR/MR) applications for mobile 
devices. Greg is serial entrepreneur who founded several successful startups in Silicon Valley and New York. 
He has been an Apple software developer for over 30 years having founded one of the first educational 
software development and publishing firms for the Apple Macintosh Computer in 1984. With a computer 
science degree from Potsdam and an MBA from Duke University, Greg mentors, consults and advises over 
a dozen Silicon Valley start-ups in early-stage growth, strategy, investment, IP, and development in all areas 
of high technology.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/gregberkin

Latif	Nathani,	Business	&	Marketing

Latif was most recently the CEO of eBay India. He grew the business from under $200M GMV in 2013 to 
nearly $500M GMV in 2016 and 5M+ customers. He exited with the sale of eBay India to Flipkart. Previously 
Latif co-founded eMemories.com (one of the first online picture sharing services) and 2 enterprise businesses 
at Microsoft (Systems Center and Speech Server). He also led global product marketing at Symantec and 
named/launched Norton 360. Latif has 26 years of technology industry experience, including 15 years at 
Microsoft. 

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/latifn

Christian	Ferri,	Blockchain	Expert

Christian Ferri has been in the crypto space since its early days in 2010 and built a solid network of early 
adopter, influencers, experts, and visionaries over the years. He founded BlockOne Ventures in 2014, one 
of the first blockchain agencies to work on crypto related projects. Today the agency has helped companies 
like Bancor, Token Card and many others to successfully raise funds through ICOs. In addition, BlockOne 
Ventures delivers corporate training on Blockchain to Fortune 500, organizes a crypto event series in 
collaboration with Draper and is managing a crypto fund for selected high-net-worth investors.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/ironsferri 

Raghu Bala, Media Expert

CEO, NetObjex Inc based in Southern California. Formerly with Yahoo, Infospace, Primedia, Source Interlink 
Media, PwC, and with 3 successful startup exits. Wharton MBA in Finance, MS in Computer Science 
from RPI, published author and major conferences including IoT Congress, Google IO, and more. Mr. Bala 
has significant domain expertise in the media industry having led digital operations for over 100 brands 
including MotorTrend, HotRod, Import Tuner, Automobile, and Slam. His responsibilities included managing 
digital assets across multiple mediums including web, mobile, video/YouTube channels, and social media. 
The portfolio of digital assets managed had a total visitor profile with monthly statistics of over 16M 
unique visitors and 100M pageviews. Mr. Bala also has deep expertise in search engine advertising and 
audience conversion from his stints at Infospace and Yahoo. Current focus areas: Decentralized computing, 
Distributed ledgers, IoT, Cryptocurrencies.

LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/raghubala 



43

COMPETITIVE ANALYSIS

I. Steemit
Steemit is another social news platform that rewards content curators and creators for posting, commenting, and 
voting. While Sapien and Steemit both share a common goal of rewarding users’ time via a decentralized Blockchain, 
the two differ significantly in philosophy and implementation.

a) Choice of Blockchain
Steemit is built on an independent Blockchain called Steem, which has been laden with controversies from the 
start. Steem developers unfairly “stealth” mined a large majority of Steem early onin the site’s development  while 
giving the impression of equal opportunity.5  Sapien opts for Ethereum because of its strong community, remarkable 
technology, maturity, and transparency. And with the second biggest coin market cap and a more organic developer 
ecosystem, Ethereum has excited many with its potential to surpass Bitcoin. For these reasons, SPN will be built as 
an ERC20 token on the Ethereum network. We have not just decided to throw the Blockchain haphazardly onto the 
platform—it is an absolutely essential innovation that has enabled Sapien to have an immutable ledger capable of 
executing smart contracts and generating token payouts for our users.

b) Distribution of Power
Secondly, Steemit has tremendous disparity in the distribution of platform power. Only individuals who have been 
around since Steemit’s inception (also known as “whales”) have the ability to earn any substantial awards and, as such, 
possess a disproportionate amount of Steem power, enabling these users to selectively pick which posts become 
“winners” and “losers.” It is publically viewable that the top 247 accounts, most of which are held by developers and 
friends, hold 87.5% of the Steem power on Steemit.6  For a site with more than 150,000 registered users, we believe 
that this level of inequality is not feasible nor sustainable in the long run. Sapien intends to learn from the innovations 
and shortcomings of Steemit to create a democratized social news platform. Steemit’s idea behind decaying and 
regenerative voting power was notable, as was its implementation of Zipf’s Law to fairly reward long-tail posts. To 
mitigate any possible disparity within Sapien, the largest SPN holder will have the exact same voting power as a 
newly registered user. To minimize manipulation, voting power will instead be acquired as a function of how much 
reputation a user has earned through quality contributions on the platform.

c) Barriers To Entry
Lastly, Steemit faces significant obstacles to appealing to a broader market. Crypto economics are already challenging 
for the non-technical consumer. Steem further complicates this with three different Steem tokens: Steem Dollars, 
Steem Power, and Steem. Not only is it surprisingly difficult to understand the use cases of each, but the entire 
endeavor seems to discourage crypto novices from joining Steemit. The average user should not be required to have 
knowledge of crypto mechanics or how to optimize their token portfolio to maximize rewards. Our goal with Sapien 
will be to continually develop two parallel user experiences: one for the novice and one for the advanced user. For the 
novice, Sapien will automagically manage wallets, addresses, and two-factor authentication with a usability similar to 
that of Coinbase. Advanced users will have direct and full access to their wallet, along with various other metrics and 
customizations. By differentiating these two target users, the Sapien platform and the SPN token will be in the best 
position for adoption by the most number of people.

5 https://bitcointalk.org/index.php?topic=1427230.0
6 Distribution of Steem power can be found here: https://steemd.com/distribution



44

II. Synereo

a) Technological
6. Synereo's older AMP token is not an ERC20-complaint token and its total supply is fixed. This prevents the 

token from taking advantage of the Ethereum Blockchain base security, the fantastic community, and continual 
developments like Plasma and Raiden.

7. Synereo intends to store too much information on the blockchain. This inherently limits its usability. Our 
multimedia storage options include IPFS, Swarm, and FileCoin—all of which will scale nicely and improve 
performance drastically.

8. WildSpark is an extension, whereas Sapien is an entire ecosystem. Our long-term vision includes opening up a 
developer portal to leverage the ingenuity of the open-source community where third-party applications can 
build and monetize on our platform while prioritizing user privacy.

b) Token Utility
The biggest difference between the two is in token utility is how integral SPN will be for Sapien's decentralized 
marketplace. Our marketplace will be powered by our token and offer users premium integrations, features, and 
content that can't be found anywhere else. The token will let creators set their prices and consumers enjoy a variety 
of community-sourced physical and virtual items. The Sapien Network will also let users share ad revenue in SPN 
tokens with users.

c) Philosophical
SPN tokens will be minted proportionally to the value created on Sapien, distributing the rewards among creators 
and curators. AMPs fixed supply makes people hesitant to give up something that is considered scarce. Essentially, 
Synereo's offering, Wildspark, is just a crypto-tipping extension that permanently asks its users whether it's worth 
"AMPing" something. We hope to eliminate this cognitive overhead with a sustainable secondary distribution model 
for SPN tokens that scales with the number of users and value generated. 



45

RISK ANALYSIS

Quantum Computing Attacks

Public-Key Cryptography
Ethereum, and consequently all ERC20 tokens, use a system involving pairs of public and private keys. In order to 
maintain security, only the owner of tokens at a given address should know the associated private key. If anyone else 
is able to determine the private key associated with an address, they will be able to transfer all of the tokens at that 
address. For this reason, it is of the utmost importance that the private key remain hidden.

Elliptic Curve Cryptography
Elliptic curve cryptography is an approach to public-key cryptography based on the algebraic structure of elliptic 
curves over finite fields. Elliptic key cryptography requires smaller keys compared to other public-key methods such 
as RSA. Ethereum uses the Elliptic Curve Digital Signature Algorithm (ECDSA) to secure transactions.

Elliptic Curve Discrete Logarithm
Shor’s Algorithm, invented by Peter Shor in 1994, is a quantum algorithm that solves the integer factorization 
problem, finding the prime factorization of an integer N in polynomial time. Shor’s Algorithm can be extended to 
solve the discrete logarithm problem (DLP) in polynomial time. Solving the elliptic curve discrete logarithm problem 
(ECDLP), which is a specific case of the discrete logarithm problem, would allow one to determine the private key 
from a public key, thus putting the security of all addresses at risk. The security of elliptic curve cryptography is based 
upon the intractability of the ECDLP on a classical computer. Recent work by Zalka, Proos and Kaye has led toward 
quantum algorithms to solve the ECDLP.7 Ethereum’s Metropolis update permits users to define their own security 
model. Toward this end we will ensure that all SPN addresses use Lamport signatures, which are currently believed 
to be quantum resistant.

Bots
Due to the incentivized nature of the Sapien platform, we believe that we are a potential target for botting. In order to 
reduce the risk of such manipulation, we will employ several precautionary measures. Users will be required to pass a 
captcha in order to create their account and post or comment after long periods of inactivity. In addition, users must 
verify either a phone number or an email address associated with their account. Accounts suspected of using bots for 
a malicious purpose will have their SPN tokens seized and deleted promptly.

Sybil Attacks
All peer-to-peer networks are susceptible to the problem of adversaries working counter to honest participants. 
For cryptocurrencies, one of the goals of the participants in the network is to reach a consensus via a majority vote. 
This means that any adversary with the resources to allocate many IP addresses could influence the consensus of 
the entire network. One of Bitcoin’s key innovations was the use of Proof-of-Work (PoW) as a way of “determining 
representation in majority decision making” through computation. PoW requires nodes to solve a cryptographic 
problem, which is CPU-intensive to calculate, but easy for other participants to verify. As a consequence, an attacker. 
wishing to alter the history of the Blockchain is required to solve the PoW for their block and every subsequent 
block that came after. As long as the number of honest nodes is greater than the number of adversary nodes, it is 

7 https://arxiv.org/abs/quant-ph/0301141



46

probabilistically infeasible for this event to occur.

Sapien will eventually migrate to a mechanism similar to the proposed Casper protocol, which is a deposit + penalty 
PoS. In this scheme, validators will be punished for contradicting themselves.

Inflation
Excess minting of SPN within the Sapien ecosystem will result in unfair dilutions for SPN holders. As opposed to 
traditional companies, one clear advantage of Sapien will be the ability to directly share economic growth with its 
users. All new SPN that will be minted aims to distribute the value generated back to the content creators. To prevent 
the devaluing of SPN, we will focus on maintaining a steady inflation rate that will closely mirror that of Ether’s. The 
first year will have a projected inflation rate of 5%, as each new user joining the platform will be given some initial 
SPN to use the platform. Users who register early on will be given more SPN tokens than those that register later. 
Ethereum has plans to reduce Ether issuance before migrating to a Proof-of-Stake with the Serenity milestone. SPN 
will follow a similar trajectory, closely emulating the inflation rate of the Blockchain it is based on. 

Sapien will be well-equipped to handle fluctuations in the digital currency value. Mechanisms to increase SPN 
inflation rate include increasing utilized SPN interest rates and increasing digital content payouts. Conversely, SPN 
can be reduced by decreasing payouts and lowering interest rates. Even more precise control can be established 
by burning excess SPN tokens in reserves or storing excess SPN tokens in reward pools to be distributed in a user 
reward pool annually. All actions will be performed transparently with the intention of stabilizing, maintaining, and 
scaling a highly valuable token.



47

TECHNICAL CONSIDERATIONS FOR A 
DAPP

To ensure that the integration of SPN works seamlessly for all its users, the Sapien Platform will initially be a 
hybrid centralized-decentralized web application. While the social platform will be centralized, all SPN transactions 
(previously outlined in the token utility section) will be decentralized and handled by the Ethereum Blockchain. As 
Sapien and the SPN token approach stability, our team will begin decentralizing more components of the social 
platform, as illustrated by our roadmap. To combat censorship and guarantee the web immortality of content, Sapien 
will first transition to Swarm or IPFS (Interplanetary File System) system to store posts, comments, and media 
without a central authority. Currently, the application is not decentralized to allow our team to better understand 
how the token will work within the ecosystem and carefully moderate any attempts to manipulate the payout system. 
Additionally, Vitalik Buterin has promised several improvements to Ethereum, most of which are required to scale to 
millions of users. The Ethereum Blockchain needs to increase transaction speeds and lower prices to even entertain 
the thought of a decentralized social news platform at the same scale as Reddit. As technological improvements are 
made, the core development team will move the Sapien platform over to a complete DApp.

Data
Due to nature of the Blockchain, any data stored on it is both public and expensive. Therefore, it is logical for us to 
minimize the amount of data stored on the Blockchain. Data security, redundancy, and performance will always be 
a priority for us. To eventually support a platform that is fully decentralized, censor-resistant, and immutable we will 
plan to use off-Blockchain storage like Filecoin or Swarm.

Beta Release
The current implementation of Sapien is built with an open source, full-stack Javascript framework called Meteor.js. 
8 The framework is fast, cross-platform, and is equipped with many features right out of the box. Moreover, Meteor 
is the most common framework used to build DApps. With strong community support and frequent optimizations, 
Meteor was the perfect framework to build Sapien quickly and securely. For our chat solution, we are using a forked 
version of Rocket.Chat, another open-source chat solution built with Meteor. Rocket.chat is highly configurable and 
comes standard with channels, groups, video, audio support, and much more.9  Although Rocket.Chat is perfect for 
a centralized platform, a decentralized release of Sapien will require a separate chat DApp built with the Whisper 
communication protocol.

8 https://www.meteor.com
9 https://rocket.chat



48

SPN Integration
Prior to the completion of the SPN token sale, the Sapien beta platform will have an integration of SPN on the 
Ethereum mainnet. The Sapien platform will allow users to post, comment, and vote, powered by the SPN token. 
Thus, immediately after the completion of the token sale, the SPN token utility can be explored by our contributors.

Search
Search is currently handled by AWS’s ElasticSearch Service.10  Elasticsearch is a secure, fast, and scalable solution 
for indexing documents with high availability. Our team will stay up to date with any new developments for search 
solutions that work with the Ethereum Blockchain. One such solution is a node package called Elastic Ethereum.11 

Storage
AWS S3 buckets are used to store multimedia data for posts, comments, and users. AWS S3 is an affordable and 
scalable solution for data. Although it will suffice for Sapien, the data will be migrated over as soon as an alternative, 
scalable solution is offered.

Decentralized Release
As the Ethereum ecosystem matures, new and powerful technologies will emerge. Currently, we have outlined several 
technologies that can help us create a fully decentralized social platform.

Blockchain
Metropolis

Metropolis provides usability improvements, such as letting recipients pay gas fees instead of senders, anonymous 
transactions, and improvements to smart contracts. This is a major step in the development of Ethereum. By adding 
the ability to select who pays for gas fees, Sapien will be able to more fairly implement premium content and tipping. 
Anonymous transactions also bolster the privacy of the platform and will be used for transactions that require more 
privacy.

Sharding

Ethereum has invented a novel way to scale Ethereum’s Blockchain through sharding. Sharding simplifies the way the 
Blockchain is validated by enabling addresses to form groups that internally approve transactions and communicate 
with other shards. As a result, Ethereum can scale more efficiently because not all nodes need to execute every 
transaction. To reduce protocol complexity, developers do not need to do additional work to implement sharding.

Off-chain
Whisper12 

Whisper is a communication protocol that enables DApps to communicate with each other. It is ideal for chat 
applications in the Ethereum ecosystem that require secure communications between two entities. By default, all of 
Sapien users’ communications will go through Whisper, and all extended functionality not immediately supported by 
Whisper will be handled through centralized servers.

10 https://aws.amazon.com/elasticsearch-service
11 https://github.com/nexusdev/elastic-ethereum
12 https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Whisper



49

Raiden 13

Raiden increases the scalability and performance of Ethereum-based applications. Raiden enables off-Blockchain 
transactions that avoid the Blockchain consensus bottleneck by creating a deterministic graph layer for nodes to 
communicate even if they are not directly connected. State channels could be essential to Sapien, as it permits faster 
microtransactions and lower fees for all actions on the platform. The performance of SPN will scale linearly with the 
number of users on the network, providing Sapien with the foundation to scale to millions of users.

Plasma14 

“Plasma is a proposed framework for incentivized and enforced execution of smart contracts which is scalable to a 
significant amount of state updates per second (potentially billions) enabling the Blockchain to be able to represent 
a significant amount of decentralized financial applications worldwide.” Plasma offers additional improvements that 
unburden transactions from Ethereum’s Blockchain, which makes it possible to decentralize a social platform. If our 
core team decides Plasma is the best approach, then a tokenized Proof-of-Stake will be chosen as the consensus 
mechanism described in detail in the Plasma white paper. The following diagram illustrates a Sapien implementation 
with Plasma:

13 https://raiden.network
14 Reddit Clone built on the Blockchain. http://plasma.io/plasma.pdf

Lighting	Network:
Instant Contracts and 

Payments

Plasma:
Leisure and Compute 

Scaling

Blockchain:
(i.e Ethereum Mainnet)



50

Vote	for	Comment	

#2

(5th Tree Depth)

Comment	#1	for	

Post #3

(4th Tree Depth)

Post #1 in Gaming 

and   Technology

(3rd Tree Depth)

Gaming

(2nd Tree Depth)

Comment	#2	for	

Post #3

(4th Tree Depth)

Post #2 in 

Technology

(3rd Tree Depth)

Technology

(2nd Tree Depth)

Sapien

(1st Tree Depth)

Ethereum Blockchain

- Smart Contracts Consensus Rules

- Fraud Proofs

Vote	for	Post	#3

(4th Tree Depth)

Post #3 in 

Technology

(3rd Tree Depth)

Politics

(2nd Tree Depth)

IPFS & Swarm15 
Sapien will transfer all multimedia (images, videos, attachments) from AWS S3 to decentralized databases. Currently, 
the two most popular decentralized storage solutions include IPFS and Swarm. Both are content delivery protocols 
that work with a network of cooperating nodes that store data in encrypted chunks. They also share the following 
properties: censorship-resistance, permanent content, redundant storage, and efficient scalability. While IPFS has 
already been released and begun building a large community, Swarm is still in the early stages of its developers 
testnet. IPFS can potentially work with any Blockchain, whereas Swarm is part of the Ethereum ecosystem. As a 
part of the Ethereum p2p network layer, Swarm adds monetary incentivization and the benefits of smart contracts. 
Filecoin adds incentivization to IPFS, but it relies on its own altcoin and can only implement positive incentives. 
Similar to Plasma and other off-chain solutions, Swarm will handle all major disputes in the root Ethereum Blockchain, 
which will ensure that all content on Sapien is protected. Sapien will ultimately use one of these solutions for our 
decentralized release. Rather than committing to one storage solution, our development team will continually monitor 
the progress of both of these protocols and any new innovations. Eventually, we will utilize the most secure, robust, 
scalable, and performative solution.

15 IPFS vs. Swarm: https://github.com/ethersphere/go-ethereum/wiki/IPFS-&-SWARM



51



52

REFERENCES

Ethereum. Ethereum. https://ethereum.org.

Satoshi Nakamoto. Bitcoin: A Peer-to-peer Electronic Cash System. https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf, Oct 2008.

Joseph Poon and Tadge Dryja. Lightning Network. 
https://lightning.network/lightning-network-paper.pdf, Mar 2015.

Joseph Poon. Vitalik Buterin. Plasma White Paper. http://plasma.io/plasma.pdf 

Vitalik Buterin. Ethereum Sharding FAQ. https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Sharding-FAQ 

Raiden Network. https://raiden.network

Steem White Paper. https://steem.io/SteemWhitePaper.pdf 

BlockGeeks. Smart Contracts: The Blockchain Technology That Will Replace Lawyers 
https://blockgeeks.com/guides/smart-contracts 

Meteor Web Framework. https://www.meteor.com 

RocketChat Platform. https://rocket.chat 

Coindesk. Metropolis: Ethereum’s Next Big Upgrade. 
https://www.coindesk.com/metropolis-today-shifting-plans-ethereums-next-big-upgrade

Github, Ethereum/Whisper. https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Whisper

IPFS. https://ipfs.io

Proos, John, and Christof Zalka. “Shor’s Discrete Logarithm Quantum Algorithm for Elliptic Curves.” 
https://arxiv.org/abs/quant-ph/0301141

IPFS & Swarm. https://github.com/ethersphere/go-ethereum/wiki/IPFS-&-SWARM 

Statista. “Number of Social Media Users.” 
https://www.statista.com/statistics/251666/number-of-digital-buyers-worldwide 

Boyd, Andrew W. “A Longitudinal Study of Social Media Privacy Behavior.” (2011) 
https://www.semanticscholar.org/paper/A-Longitudinal-Study-of-Social-Media-Privacy-Behav-Boyd/95285bbb961
87f3252a4afd3b6df07060c29c4bd?tab=abstract 

Business Live. “Putting the world’s money into perspective.” 
https://www.businesslive.co.za/fm/fm-fox/numbers/2017-07-06-infographic-puts-the-worlds-money-into-
perspective 

https://ethereum.org.
https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf, Oct 2008. 
https://lightning.network/lightning-network-paper.pdf, Mar 2015. 
http://plasma.io/plasma.pdf  
https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Sharding-FAQ  
 https://raiden.network 
 https://steem.io/SteemWhitePaper.pdf  
https://blockgeeks.com/guides/smart-contracts 
https://www.meteor.com  
https://rocket.chat  
https://www.coindesk.com/metropolis-today-shifting-plans-ethereums-next-big-upgrade 
https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Whisper 
https://ipfs.io 
https://arxiv.org/abs/quant-ph/0301141
https://github.com/ethersphere/go-ethereum/wiki/IPFS-&-SWARM  
https://www.statista.com/statistics/251666/number-of-digital-buyers-worldwide 
https://www.semanticscholar.org/paper/A-Longitudinal-Study-of-Social-Media-Privacy-Behav-Boyd/95285b
https://www.semanticscholar.org/paper/A-Longitudinal-Study-of-Social-Media-Privacy-Behav-Boyd/95285b
https://www.businesslive.co.za/fm/fm-fox/numbers/2017-07-06-infographic-puts-the-worlds-money-into-p
https://www.businesslive.co.za/fm/fm-fox/numbers/2017-07-06-infographic-puts-the-worlds-money-into-p

	Glossary
	ERC20
	Sapien Platform
	Sapien Network / Ecosystem
	Branch
	SPN
	Staked SPN
	Unstaked SPN

	Overview
	SPN Token Sale
	SPN Utility

	Introduction
	What is Sapien?
	Core Values
	Key Features
	Live Beta 

	Objectives
	Establish a Proof of Value Consensus Protocol
	Launch the first Democratized Autonomous Platform
	Build a Robust Marketplace and Incentivize User Contributions
	Power Future Applications on the Sapien Network

	Why Contribute?
	Product Roadmap
	User Stories
	Creators
	Curators
	Freelancers
	Developers
	Media Companies

	Market Opportunity
	Social Media
	E-Commerce
	Privacy
	Media

	Business Model
	Marketplace
	Buyers & Sellers
	Sapien

	Ad Platform
	Users
	Advertisers
	Sapien

	Extend to other Websites

	Token Sale
	Presale	
	Allocation of Presale Funds
	Token Sale Phase #1
	Minimum Goal
	How to Contribute
	Allocation of Funds (2018 - 2022)
	Distribution of Tokens
	Incentivizing the Network Effect

	SPN Token
	Proposed Utilities
	Utility I: Staked SPN to Power the Sapien Platform
	Utility II: Reputation Network built-in the SPN token
	Utility III: Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Proposals
	Utility IV: Content Payouts and User-to-user Tips
	Utility V: Standardized Token for Integrated Marketplace
	Utility VI: Ad Platform Revenue Sharing

	Use Cases
	Use Case I: Fake News
	Use Case II: Unified Media Portal
	Use Case III: Tokenizing Virtual Goods


	Platform Features
	How to Register
	How to Qualify for Platform Payouts
	Reputation
	Backfeed Protocol

	Voting Mechanisms
	Rewards for Posting, Commenting, and Voting Rewards
	Posting & Commenting Payouts
	Voting Payouts
	SPN Payout Management
	How We Handle Voting Manipulation

	Democratized Autonomous Platform (DAP) Implementation
	Proposal System
	Branch Autonomy
	Tribunals


	Token Mechanics
	Staking SPN
	Staked SPN Capacity Bonus

	Unstaking SPN
	SPN Consensus Mechanism

	Leadership
	Core
	Advisors

	Competitive Analysis
	I. Steemit
	a) Choice of Blockchain
	b) Distribution of Power
	c) Barriers To Entry

	II. Synereo
	a) Technological
	b) Token Utility
	c) Philosophical


	Risk Analysis
	Quantum Computing Attacks
	Public-Key Cryptography
	Elliptic Curve Cryptography
	Elliptic Curve Discrete Logarithm

	Bots
	Sybil Attacks
	Inflation

	Technical Considerations for a Dapp
	Data
	Beta Release
	SPN Integration
	Search
	Storage

	Decentralized Release
	Blockchain
	Off-chain

	IPFS & Swarm 

	References

